csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_Cnj_aa.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziwaan
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziweg
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziwan
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanzigwaa
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanzinig
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanzig
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziwaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaanziwang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: ayaaman
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: ayaamaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: ayaangwaa
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: ayaaminid
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: ayaamowaad
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaamang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: ayaameg
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: MISSING
